Nebraska, session 109, LB273.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB273 LB273
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 30-3417, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
30-3417 (1) When the authority conferred by a power of attorney for
health care has commenced, the attorney in fact, subject to any
instructions and limitations set forth in the power of attorney for
health care or elsewhere, shall make health care decisions on the
principal's behalf, except that the attorney in fact shall not have
authority to (a) to consent to any act or omission to which the principal
could not consent under law, (b) to make any decision that will result in
the death of the principal's unborn child when the principal is known to
be pregnant and the unborn child is likely to that will result in the
death of the principal's unborn child and it is probable that the unborn
child will develop to the point of live birth unless the principal's
treating physician determines that the principal's life is at risk, with
continued application of health care, or (c) to make decisions regarding
withholding or withdrawing a life-sustaining procedure or withholding or
withdrawing artificially administered nutrition and hydration except as
provided under section 30-3418.
(2) The attorney in fact shall have priority over any person other
than the principal to act for the principal in all health care decisions,
except that the attorney in fact shall not have the authority to make any
health care decision unless and until the principal has been determined
to be incapable of making health care decisions pursuant to section
30-3412.
(3) The attorney in fact shall not be personally responsible for the
cost of health care provided to the principal.
(4) Except to the extent that the right is limited by the power of
attorney for health care, an attorney in fact shall have the same right
as the principal to receive information regarding the proposed health
care, to receive and review medical and clinical records, and to consent
to the disclosures of such records, except that the right to access such
-2-

LB273 LB273
2025 2025
records shall not be a waiver of any evidentiary privilege.
(5) Notwithstanding a determination pursuant to section 30-3412 that
the principal is incapable of making health care decisions, when a
principal objects to the determination or to a health care decision made
by an attorney in fact, the principal's objection or decision shall
prevail unless the principal is determined by a county court to be
incapable of making health care decisions.
(6) No health care provider shall be required to accept health care
decisions from an attorney in fact until such health care provider has
received a signed original or a photostatic copy of a signed original
power of attorney for health care.
Sec. 2. Original section 30-3417, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, is repealed.
-3-